Utah statutes.
65A-3-3.   Enforcement of laws on state lands -- County attorney or district
attorney to prosecute.
(1)  It is the duty of the division, county sheriffs, their deputies, peace
officers, and other law enforcement officers within their jurisdiction to
enforce the provisions of this chapter and to investigate and gather evidence
that may indicate a violation under this chapter.
(2)  The county attorney or district attorney as appropriate under Sections
17-18-1, 17-18-1.5, and 17-18-1.7 shall prosecute any criminal violations of
this chapter and shall initiate a civil action to recover suppression costs
incurred by the county or state for suppression of fire on private land.
